Arkansas, session 2025, HB1352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
6-60-123. Prohibited institutes.
*CRH083*
04-07-2025 11:17:15 CRH083

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 H3/5/25 S4/7/25 HB1352
(a) The state shall withhold funding for a state-supported institution
of higher education that has a Confucius Institute or similar institute
related to the People's Republic of China, including without limitation a
Chinese cultural center.
(b)(1) A state-supported institution of higher education shall certify
annually that the state-supported institution of higher education does not
have a prohibited institution described in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A state-supported institution of higher education shall
abolish any existing Confucius Institute or similar institute related to the
People's Republic of China by December 31, 2025.
(3) If a state-supported institution of higher education does
not certify that it does not have a prohibited institution as required by
subdivision (b)(1) of this section, state funding for the state-supported
institution of higher education shall be withheld.

6-60-124. Prohibited investments.
A state-supported institution of higher education shall not invest in a
Chinese company or a restricted investment product consistent with § 25-1-
1301 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-1-111. Certain sister cities prohibited — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "prohibited foreign party" means a:
(1) Citizen or resident of a country subject to International
Traffic in Arms Regulations, 22 C.F.R. § 126.1, as existing on January 1,
2025;
(2) Foreign government formed within a country subject to
International Traffic in Arms Regulations, 22 C.F.R. § 126.1, as existing on
January 1, 2025; or
(3) Party other than an individual or a government that is
created or organized under the laws of a foreign government within a country
subject to International Traffic in Arms Regulations, 22 C.F.R. § 126.1, as
existing on January 1, 2025.
(b) A municipality shall not form a sister city with a prohibited
foreign party.
04-07-2025 11:17:15 CRH083

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 H3/5/25 S4/7/25 HB1352
(c) A sister city formed between a municipality and a prohibited
foreign party before the effective date of this section shall be terminated.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 13 — Investment of Funds in Chinese Company

25-1-1301. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Chinese company” means a company, other than a United
States person or United States subsidiary as defined by 15 C.F.R. § 772.1, as
it existed on January 1, 2025, that:
(i) Is domiciled, incorporated, issued, or listed in
the People’s Republic of China;
(ii) Is headquartered in the People’s Republic of
China;
(iii) Has its principal place of business in the
People’s Republic of China;
(iv) Is controlled by the government of the People’s
Republic of China, the Communist Party of China, the People's Liberation
Army, or any instrumentality thereof, including without limitation the State-
owned Assets Supervision and Administration Commission of the State Council
or the National Social Security Fund; or
(v) Is majority-owned by an entity controlled by the
government of the People’s Republic of China, the Communist Party of China,
the People's Liberation Army, or any instrumentality thereof, including the
State-owned Assets Supervision and Administration Commission of the State
Council or the National Social Security Fund.
(B) "Chinese company" does not include a parent company
that has one (1) or more subsidiaries or affiliates that meet the definition
under subdivision (1)(A) of this section if the parent company does not:
(i) Meet the criteria in subdivision (1)(A); and
(ii) Recognize more than fifty percent (50%) of the
total annual global revenue of the parent company and subsidiaries from The
People's Republic of China and Hong Kong Special Administrative Region
combined;
04-07-2025 11:17:15 CRH083

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 H3/5/25 S4/7/25 HB1352
(2) “Company” means a sole proprietorship, organization,
association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership,
limited liability partnership, limited liability company, or any other entity
or business association, including without limitation all wholly-owned
subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, and parent companies, or an
affiliate that exists for the purpose of making a profit;
(3) “Control” means:
(A) The same as defined in the Investment Company Act of
1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-2, as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(B) Involvement in an entity’s governance structure,
monitoring, or internal human resources decisions of an entity;
(4) “Fiduciary” means a person who:
(A) Exercises authority to invest or manage the assets of
a state or local fund;
(B) Provides investment advice for a fee or other direct
or indirect compensation with respect to the assets of a state or local fund
or has authority or responsibility to provide investment advice; or
(C) Is a member of a public investment entity;
(5) “Investment product” means a commingled fund or a collective
investment, including without limitation a mutual fund or an index fund, in
which a public investment entity, state fund, or local fund together with one
(1) or more other investors share ownership or interest in the investments;
(6) “Private equity” means an asset class consisting of equity
or debt in companies or real property that are not publicly traded on a
listed stock exchange, whether owned directly by a public investment entity
or indirectly through a limited partnership or other company;
(7) “Public investment entity” means:
(A) A state or local board, political subdivision, or
other governing body within the state other than an individually directed
defined contribution plan that is responsible for investing or managing a
state or local fund, including without limitation public pension funds;
(B) Public retirement funds;
(C) City, county, or other local or municipal entity
investment funds;
(D) Institution of higher education public funds or a
qualified tuition program under 26 U.S.C. § 529, as it existed on January 1,
04-07-2025 11:17:15 CRH083

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 H3/5/25 S4/7/25 HB1352
2025;
(E) The Treasurer of State; and
(F) Other state-sponsored funds;
(8) “Restricted investment product” means an investment in a
Chinese company or an investment product that holds one (1) or more publicly-
traded investments in a Chinese company; and
(9) "Venture capital” means an investment of capital to a
business at any stage of its development before the business makes a public
offering of stock.

25-1-1302. Prohibited investments.
(a) Notwithstanding any other statutes, except as provided in § 25-1-
1305, this subchapter restricts the investment and financial decisions of all
public investment entities.
(b) A public investment entity, a service provider contracted by a
public investment entity, and all other fiduciaries shall not knowingly:
(1) Invest state or local funds in a Chinese company or
restricted investment product after the effective date of this subchapter; or
(2) Deposit state or local funds in a Chinese company that is a
bank or financial institution after the effective date of this subchapter.

25-1-1303. Reporting requirements.
(a) Within six (6) months of the effective date of this subchapter and
at least annually each year before July 1, a public investment entity shall:
(1) Make a good faith effort to identify all investments in a
Chinese company or restricted investment product.
(A) The good faith effort to identify all investments
required under subdivision (1) of this section shall include at least one (1)
of the following:
(i) A review of publicly available information on
where companies are incorporated, headquartered, and conduct business,
including without limitation information provided by non-profit
organizations, research firms, and government entities;
(ii) Contact with asset managers or other applicable
service providers contracted by the public investment entity for information
on investments the service provider has made on behalf of the public
04-07-2025 11:17:15 CRH083

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 H3/5/25 S4/7/25 HB1352
investment entity;
(iii) Use of an independent research firm for
assistance; or
(iv) Reliance on the representations of an
investment manager, investment advisor, or investment index provider as to
the identification of a Chinese company within an investment product; and
(2) Publish a report listing all the Chinese companies or
restricted investment products in which the public investment entity
currently has investments.
(b) If a public investment entity has determined the public investment
entity has no investments required to be reported under subsection (a) of
this section, the public investment entity shall file a report indicating
that there are no investments to report.

25-1-1304. Mandatory divestment.
(a)(1) If a public investment entity reports an investment in a
Chinese company or a restricted investment product under § 25-1-1303, the
public investment entity shall establish a plan to divest from the Chinese
company or restricted investment product.
(2) The public investment entity shall complete the divestment
required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section as soon as financially
prudent.
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(2) of this section, a public
investment entity shall remove one hundred percent (100%) of investments in a
Chinese company or a restricted investment product from a fund’s assets
within twelve (12) months after the public investment entity first reports
the investment in the Chinese company or restricted investment product.
(b) Divestment as required by subsection (a) of this section is not
required from a restricted investment product if:
(1) Less than one percent (1%) of the value of the restricted
investment product is made up of investments in Chinese companies; or
(2) The cost over the next five (5) years to the public
investment entity of divesting from the restricted investment product is
greater than one percent (1%) of the value of the public investment entity's
total investment portfolio.
(c)(1) If an investment is subject to divestment under this subchapter
04-07-2025 11:17:15 CRH083

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 H3/5/25 S4/7/25 HB1352
but is locked into a maturity date and an early divestment would result in a
financial penalty or loss and cause a negative financial impact to the state,
the investment is exempt from divestiture under this subchapter in order to
prevent financial harm to the state and to ensure that the fiduciary duty for
the state is met.
(2) Exemption from divestiture under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall extend no more than twelve (12) months after the maturity date
or after the date on which the divestment would not result in a financial
penalty or loss, whichever occurs first.

25-1-1305. Exemption for private equity and venture capital
investments.
(a) This subchapter does not restrict a private equity or venture
capital investment made in a Chinese company before the effective date of
this subchapter.
(b) After the effective date of this subchapter, a public investment
entity, a service provider contracted by a public investment entity, or any
other fiduciary shall not enter a private equity or venture capital
investment in a Chinese company.

25-1-1306. Conflicts.
With respect to an action taken in compliance with this subchapter,
including without limitation all good faith determinations regarding
investing in a Chinese company or restricted investment product, a public
investment entity is exempt from any conflicting state statutory or common
law obligations, including without limitation an obligation regarding the
choice of an asset manager, investment fund, or investment of a fund
investment portfolio.

25-1-1307. Immunity.
(a) The state and its officers, agents, and employees and a public
investment entity and its board members, executive director, officers,
agents, and employees are immune from civil liability for any act or omission
related to the removal of an asset from a fund under this subchapter.
(b) In addition to the immunity provided under subsection (a) of this
section, an officer, agent, and employee of the state and a board member,
04-07-2025 11:17:15 CRH083

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 H3/5/25 S4/7/25 HB1352
executive director, officer, agent, and employee of a public investment
entity are entitled to indemnification from the public investment entity for
all losses, costs, and expenses, including without limitation reasonable
attorney’s fees associated with defending against a claim or suit relating to
this subchapter.

25-1-1308. Severability.
If any provision of this subchapter or the application of this
subchapter to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity
shall not affect other provisions or applications of this subchapter which
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this
end, the provisions of this subchapter are declared severable.

/s/Beaty Jr.






















04-07-2025 11:17:15 CRH083